Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-409
Legislative Council; state and local governments; cooperation.

Each officer, board, commission, or department of state government or any local government shall make such studies for and furnish information to the Legislative Council, including any division established within the Legislative Council, as the council may require and as can be made within the limits of its appropriation. Requests for information made under this section shall not be subject to the procedures for public record requests provided in sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.

Laws 1937, c. 118, § 5, p. 423;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 50-505;

R.S.1943, § 50-409;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 77.